Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-17,113
Property taxation and collection.

The property of a credit union shall be subject to taxation in the same manner as provided by law in the case of corporations or individuals. Nothing in this section shall prevent holdings in any credit union organized under the Credit Union Act from being included in the valuation of the personal property of the owners or holders of such holdings in assessing taxes imposed by the authority of the state or any political subdivision thereof in which the credit union is located. The duty of collecting or enforcing the payment of such tax shall not be imposed upon any credit union.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 113.